California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) Section 1033(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “subdivision (a) of Section 24943” in lieu of “subsection (a)(1).”

(c) Section 1033(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “subdivision (b) of
 Section 24943” in lieu of “subsection (a)(2).”

(d) Section 1033(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “subdivision (b) of Section 24943” in lieu of “subsection (a)(2)(E).”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 98.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24948.

For purposes of this part, if property lying within an irrigation project is sold or otherwise disposed of in order to conform to the acreage limitation provisions of federal reclamation laws, such sale or disposition shall be treated as an involuntary conversion to which Sections 24943 to 24949, inclusive, apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 846.)
-------------------------------------------

24949.

For purposes of this part, if livestock are destroyed by or on account of disease, or are sold or exchanged because of disease, such destruction or such sale or exchange shall be treated as an involuntary conversion to which Sections 24943 to 24949, inclusive, apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 846.)
-------------------------------------------

24949.1.

(a) For purposes of this part, the sale or exchange of livestock (other than poultry) held by a taxpayer for draft, breeding, or dairy purposes in excess of the number the taxpayer would sell if he or she followed his or her usual business practices shall be treated as an involuntary conversion to which Sections 24943 to 24949, inclusive, apply if the livestock are sold or exchanged by the taxpayer solely on account of drought, flood, or other weather-related conditions.

(b) (1) In the case of drought, flood, or other weather-related conditions described in subdivision (a) that result in the area being designated as eligible for assistance by the federal government, subdivision (b) of Section 24944 shall be applied with respect to any converted property by substituting “four years” for “two years.”

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may extend the period for replacement under Sections 24943 to 24949, inclusive (after the application of paragraph (1)), for the additional time as the Franchise Tax Board determines appropriate if the weather-related conditions that resulted in the application of paragraph (1) continue for more than three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 74.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

24949.2.

(a) For purposes of Sections 24943 through 24945, if real property (not including stock in trade or other property held primarily for sale) held for productive use in trade or business or for investment is (as a result of its seizure, requisition, or condemnation, or threat or imminence thereof) compulsorily or involuntarily converted, property of a like kind to be held either for productive use in trade or business or for investment shall be treated as property similar or related in service or use to the property so converted.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to the purchase of stock in the acquisition of control of a corporation described in subdivision (a) of Section 24944. 

(2) Subdivision (a) shall apply with respect to the compulsory or involuntary conversion of any real property only if the disposition of the converted property (within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 24943) occurs after December 31, 1960.

(c) (1) A taxpayer may elect, at such time and in such manner as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe, to treat property which constitutes an outdoor advertising display as real property for purposes of this part with respect to which an election under Section 24356.2 (relating to election to expense certain depreciable business assets) is in effect.

(2) An
 election made under paragraph (1) may not be revoked without the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “outdoor advertising display” means a rigidly assembled sign, display, or device permanently affixed to the ground or permanently attached to a building or other inherently permanent structure constituting, or used for the display of, a commercial or other advertisement to the public.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, an interest in real property purchased as replacement property for a compulsorily or involuntarily converted outdoor advertising display defined in paragraph (3) (and treated by the taxpayer as real property) shall be considered property of a like kind as the property converted without regard to whether the taxpayer’s interest in the replacement property is the same kind of interest the taxpayer held in the converted
 property.

(d) In the case of a compulsory or involuntary conversion described in subdivision (a), paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 24944 shall be applied by substituting “three years” for “two years.”

(e) Subdivision (d) shall apply with respect to any disposition of converted property (within the meaning of Section 24944) after December 31, 1976.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 45, Sec. 16.   Effective March 20, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

24949.3.

For purposes of Sections 24943 through 24946, if, because of drought, flood, other weather-related conditions, or soil contamination or other environmental contamination, it is not feasible for the taxpayer to reinvest the proceeds from compulsorily or involuntarily converted livestock in property similar or related in use to the livestock so converted, other property (including real property in the case of soil contamination or other environmental contamination) used for farming purposes shall be treated as property similar or related in service or use to
 the livestock so converted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 75.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

24949.5.

(a) For purposes of Sections 24943 through 24946, Section 1033(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for property damaged by federally declared disasters, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) For purposes of Sections 24943 through 24946, Section 1033(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to
 replacement property must be acquired from unrelated person in certain cases, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(c) For purposes of Sections 24943 through 24946, Section 1033(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to sales or exchanges to implement microwave relocation policy, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(d) For purposes of Sections 24943 to 24946, inclusive, Section 1033(k) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to sales or exchanges under certain hazard mitigation programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 78.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24950.

Section 1035 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain exchanges of insurance policies, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 82.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24950.5.

The amendments made by Section 844 of the Pension Protection Act of 2006 (Public Law 109-280) to Section 1035 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 79.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24951.

Section 1036 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to stock for stock of same corporation, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 83.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24952.

(a) If—(1) A sale of real property gives rise to indebtedness to the seller which is secured by the real property sold, and(2) The seller of such
 property reacquires such property in partial or full satisfaction of such indebtedness,then, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (d), no gain or loss shall result to the seller from such reacquisition, and no debt shall become worthless or partially worthless as a result of such reacquisition.

(b) (1) In the case of a reacquisition of real property to which subdivision (a) applies, gain shall result from such reacquisition to the extent that—

(A) The amount of money and the fair market value of other property (other than obligations of the purchaser) received, prior to such reacquisition, with respect to the sale of such property, exceeds

(B) The amount of the gain on the sale of such property included in the measure of tax or
 returned as income for periods prior to such reacquisition.

(2) The amount of gain determined under paragraph (1) resulting from a reacquisition during any taxable year beginning after December 31, 1964, shall not exceed the amount by which the price at which the real property was sold exceeded its adjusted basis, reduced by the sum of—

(A) The amount of the gain on the sale of such property included in the measure of tax or returned as income for periods prior to the reacquisition of such property, and

(B) The amount of money and the fair market value of other property (other than obligations of the purchaser received with respect to the sale of such property) paid or transferred by the seller in connection with the reacquisition of such property.

For purposes of this
 paragraph, the price at which real property is sold is the gross sales price reduced by the selling commissions, legal fees, and other expenses incident to the sale of such property which are properly taken into account in determining gain or loss on such sale.

(3) Except as provided in this section, the gain determined under this subdivision resulting from a reacquisition to which subdivision (a) applies shall be recognized, notwithstanding any other provision of this part.

(c) If subdivision (a) applies to the reacquisition of any real property, the basis of such property upon such reacquisition shall be the adjusted basis of the indebtedness to the seller secured by such property (determined as of the date of reacquisition), increased by the sum of—

(1) The amount of the gain determined under subdivision (b)
 resulting from such reacquisition, and

(2) The amount described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

If any indebtedness to the seller secured by such property is not discharged upon the reacquisition of such property, the basis of such indebtedness shall be zero.

(d) If, prior to a reacquisition of real property to which subdivision (a) applies, the seller has treated indebtedness secured by such property as having become worthless or partially worthless—

(1) Such seller shall be considered as receiving, upon the reacquisition of such property, an amount equal to the amount of such indebtedness treated by him as having become worthless, and

(2) The adjusted basis of such indebtedness shall
 be increased (as of the date of reacquisition) by an amount equal to the amount so considered as received by such seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 207.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24953.

(a) If gain or loss from the exchange of property in this state of a taxpayer is not recognized under this part because of Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exchange of property held for productive use or investment, for a taxable year and the property acquired in that exchange is located outside of this state, the taxpayer shall file an information return with the Franchise Tax Board for the taxable year of the exchange and for each
 subsequent taxable year in which the gain or loss from that exchange has not been recognized, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) If a taxpayer fails to file an information return required pursuant to subdivision (a), and fails to file a return required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), the Franchise Tax Board may make an estimate of the net income, from any available information, including the amount of gain described in subdivision (a), and may propose to assess the amount of tax, interest, and penalties due in the same manner as Section 19087.

(c) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall apply to exchanges of property that occur in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 26, Sec. 5.   (AB 92)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

24954.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995, Section 1042 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to sales of stock to employee stock ownership plans or certain cooperatives, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 208.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24954.1.

Section 1042(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to application of section to sales of stock in agricultural refiners and processors to eligible farm cooperatives, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 101.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24955.

(a) No gain shall be recognized with respect to a sale of an assisted housing development to a tenant association, nonprofit organization, profit-motivated organization or individual, or public agency which obligates itself and any successors in interest to maintain the assisted housing development affordable to persons or families of lower income or very low income for either a period of 30 years from the date of sale or the remaining term of existing federal government assistance as listed in subdivision (a) of Section 65863.10 of
 the Government Code, whichever is greater, provided that all of the proceeds from the sale are reinvested in residential real property, other than a personal residence, in this state within two years after the sale. This obligation shall be recorded at the time of sale in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the development is located.

(b) No gain shall be recognized with respect to a sale of a majority or more of units in an assisted housing development converted to condominium interests, to a tenant association, nonprofit organization, profit-motivated organization or individual, or public agency which obligates itself and any successors in interest to maintain the condominiums affordable to persons or families of lower income or very low income for either a period of 30 years from the date of sale or the remaining term of existing federal government assistance as listed in subdivision (a) of Section 65863.10 of the
 Government Code, provided that all of the proceeds from the sale are reinvested in residential real property, other than a personal residence, in this state within two years after the sale. This obligation shall be recorded at the time of sale in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the development is located.

(c) No gain shall be recognized with respect to a sale of real property to a majority or more of existing lower income and very low income residents of that property, provided that all of the proceeds from the sale are reinvested in residential real property, other than a personal residence, in this state within two years after the sale.

(d) No gain shall be recognized with respect to a sale of a majority or more of units converted to condominium interests to the existing lower income or very low income residents of that property, provided that all of the proceeds from the
 sale are reinvested in residential real property, other than a personal residence, in this state within two years after the sale.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Assisted housing development” means a multifamily rental housing development that receives federal government assistance, appearing of record and containing a legal description of the property, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 65863.10 of the Government Code.

(2) “Tenant association” means a group of tenants who have formed a nonprofit corporation, cooperative corporation, or other entity or organization; or a local nonprofit, regional, or national organization whose purpose includes the acquisition of an assisted housing development, real property, or condominium and which represents the interests of at least a majority of the tenants in the
 assisted housing development, real property, or condominium.

(3) “Nonprofit organization” means a not-for-profit corporation organized pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, which has as its principal purpose the ownership, development, or management of housing or community development projects for persons and families of lower income and very low income, and which has a broadly representative board, a majority of whose members are community-based and has a proven track record of community service.

(4) “Public agency” means a housing authority, redevelopment agency, or any other agency of a city, county, or city and county, whether general law or chartered, which is authorized to own, develop, or manage housing or community development projects for persons and families of lower income and very low income.

(5) “Regional or national organization” means a not-for-profit, charitable corporation organized on a multicounty, state, or multistate basis which has as its principal purpose the ownership, development, or management of housing or community development projects for persons and families of lower income and very low income.

(6) “Regional or national agency” means a multicounty, state, or multistate agency which is authorized to own, develop, or manage housing or community development projects for persons and families of lower income and very low income.

(7) “Profit-motivated organization or individual” means an individual or two or more persons organized pursuant to Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of, Division 3 (commencing with Section 1200) of Title 1 of, or Division 1 (commencing with Section
 15001) of Title 2 of, the Corporations Code, which carries on as a business for profit.

(8) “Lower income” means those residents having an income as defined by Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(9) “Very low income” means those residents having an income as defined by Section 50105 of the Health and Safety Code.

(10) “Resident” means a tenant or other person who lawfully occupies a unit located in a qualified low-income housing project as defined under Section 23610.5, and whose income qualifies as lower income or very low income.

(11) “Condominium” means the interest in real property defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code.

(f) If the purchase of residential real property
 results in the nonrecognition of gain on the sale of an assisted housing development, real property, or condominium under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), in determining the adjusted basis of the purchased residential real property as of any time following the sale of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium, the adjustments to the basis shall include a reduction by an amount equal to the amount of the gain not so recognized on the sale of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium. If more than one parcel of residential real property has been purchased, the nonrecognized gain from the sale of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium shall be attributed to the parcels of residential real property on a pro rata basis based upon the purchase prices of those parcels.

(g) In accordance with subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), if the sale of an assisted housing development, real
 property, or condominium results in a gain during the taxable year, then all of the following shall apply:

(1) The statutory period for the assessment of any deficiency attributable to any part of the gain shall not expire before the expiration of four years from the date the Franchise Tax Board is notified (on the form as the Franchise Tax Board may provide) of one of the following:

(A) The cost of purchasing the residential real property which satisfies the requirement of subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), and results in the nonrecognition of gain.

(B) The intention not to reinvest all of the proceeds from the sale in residential real property within the period specified in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d).

(C) The failure to reinvest all of the
 proceeds from the sale in residential real property within the period specified in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d). 

(2) The deficiency may be assessed before the expiration of the period specified in paragraph (1), notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or rule of law which would otherwise prevent the assessment.

(3) All information regarding the sale of an assisted housing development, real property, or condominium, at a gain in accordance with subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), shall be disclosed in the return for the taxable year in which the sale took place in order to determine if the sale qualifies and the amount of nonrecognition of gain qualifies under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d).

(h) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall do all of the following:

(1) Certify that the lower income or very low income resident meets the definitions provided in paragraphs (8) and (9) of subdivision (e).

(2) Provide an annual listing to the Franchise Tax Board, in a form and manner agreed upon by the Franchise Tax Board and the Department of Housing and Community Development, of the names and identification numbers of the persons who are members of the group of purchasers who are lower income or very low income residents that were issued a certification, and the names and identification numbers of the sellers of the property.

(3) Provide the group of purchasers who are lower income or very low income residents a copy of the certification.

(i) The group of purchasers who are lower income or very low income residents
 shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide the Department of Housing and Community Development with documents, as deemed necessary by the department, verifying the income of each member of the group.

(2) Provide a copy of the certification to the seller of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium.

(3) Retain a copy of the certification.

(j) The seller of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium shall do all of the following:

(1) Obtain a copy of the certification from the group of purchasers who are lower income or very low income residents of the assisted housing development, real property, or condominium.

(2) Retain a copy of the group’s lower income or very low income certification for tax purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 209.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Special Rules for Basis [24961. - 24966.2.]

24961.

In the case of the property acquired by a corporation, during a period of affiliation, from a corporation with which it was affiliated, the basis of such property, after such period of affiliation, shall be determined, in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board without regard to intercompany transactions in respect of which gain or loss was not recognized. The basis in case of property acquired by a corporation during any period, in the income year 1929 or any subsequent income year, in respect of which a consolidated return is made by such corporation under Article 9 of Chapter 2 or Section 141 of the Federal Revenue Act of 1928 or the Federal
 Revenue Act of 1932 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1934 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1936, or in the case of a corporation subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 3, the Federal Revenue Act of 1938, shall be determined in accordance with regulations prescribed under Article 9 of Chapter 2 or Section 141 of the Federal Revenue Act of 1928 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1932 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1936, or in the case of a corporation subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 3, the Federal Revenue Act of 1938. The basis in the case of property held by a corporation during any period, in the income year 1929 or any subsequent income year, in respect of which a consolidated return is made by such corporation under Article 9 of Chapter 2 or Section 141 of the Federal Revenue Act of 1928 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1932 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1934 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1936, or, in the case of a corporation subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 3, or the Federal Revenue Act of 1938, shall be
 adjusted in respect of any items relating to such period, in accordance with regulations prescribed under Article 9 of Chapter 2 or Section 141 of the Federal Revenue Act of 1928 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1932 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1934 or the Federal Revenue Act of 1936, or in the case of a corporation subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 3, or the Federal Revenue Act of 1938, applicable to such period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 544.)
-------------------------------------------

24962.

(a) If the property was acquired, after February 28, 1913, in any income year beginning before January 1, 1934, and the basis thereof, for purposes of the Revenue Act of 1932 was prescribed by Section 113(a) (6), (7), or (9) of such act (47 Stat. 199), then for purposes of this part the basis shall be the same as the basis therein prescribed in the Revenue Act of 1932.

(b) If the property was acquired, after February 28, 1913, in any income year beginning before January 1, 1937, and the basis thereof, for purposes of the Revenue Act of 1934, was prescribed by Section 113(a) (6), (7),
 or (8) of such act (48 Stat. 706), then for purposes of this part the basis shall be the same as the basis therein prescribed in the Revenue Act of 1934.

(c) If the property was acquired after February 28, 1913, in a transaction to which the Bank and Corporation Tax Law of 1954 applied, and the basis thereof, for purposes of the Bank and Corporation Tax Law of 1954, was prescribed by Section 25071(d), 25071(e), or 25071(f) of such law, then for purposes of this part the basis shall be the same as the basis therein prescribed in the Bank and Corporation Tax Law of 1954.

(d) Stock rights acquired after February 28, 1913, and before January 1, 1955, shall have the basis assigned to such property under Section 25071m of the Bank and Corporation Tax Law of 1954.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 544.)
-------------------------------------------

24963.

In the case of property acquired before March 1, 1913, if the basis otherwise determined under this part, adjusted (for the period before March 1, 1913) as provided in Section 24916, is less than the fair market value of the property as of March 1, 1913, then the basis for determining gain shall be such fair market value. In determining the fair market value of stock in a corporation as of March 1, 1913, due regard shall be given to the fair market value of the assets of the corporation as of that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24964.

Whenever a taxpayer has realized gain or loss upon the receipt after January 1, 1928, at a time when it was subject to a tax under this part, of all or substantially all of the business or property of a taxpayer over which it exercised control within the meaning of Section 24564, and such gain or loss actually was not taken into account in the computation of taxes imposed by this part, the basis of the property or business acquired shall be the same as it was in the hands of the transferor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24965.

In the case of a share of stock issued pursuant to Section 303(c) of the Federal National Mortgage Association Charter Act (12 U.S.C., Sec. 1718), the basis of such share in the hands of the initial holder shall be an amount equal to the capital contributions evidenced by such share reduced by the amount (if any) required by Section 24343(d) to be treated (with respect to such share) as ordinary and necessary expenses paid or incurred in carrying on a trade or business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 846.)
-------------------------------------------

24966.

(a) The basis in stock purchased shall be reduced by the nontaxed portion of any extraordinary dividend received as provided in Section 1059 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(b) The reduction described in Section 1059(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be the amount determined under Section 24402.

(c) Reference to Section 301 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be reference to Sections 24451 to 24454, inclusive.

(d) Reference to Section 301(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be reference to subdivision (b) of Section 24452.

(e) Reference to Section 301(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be reference to subdivision (b) of Section 24453.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1349, Sec. 34.3.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

24966.1.

Section 1059A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on taxpayer’s basis or inventory cost in property imported from related persons, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 85.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24966.2.

Section 1060 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special allocation rules for certain asset acquisitions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 86.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Capital Gains and Losses [24990. - 24995.]

24990.

Subchapter P of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to capital gains and losses, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 873, Sec. 47.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24990.1.

The amendments made by Section 126(a) of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 1202(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to 100 percent exclusion for stock acquired during certain periods in 2010 and thereafter, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 117.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24990.2.

Section 301 of Title III of Division A of the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-343), relating to gain or loss from sale of certain preferred stock, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 82.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24990.4.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997:

(a) Section 1237(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to real property subdivided for sale, is modified to provide that the term “other than a corporation” in the material preceding Section 1237(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall instead mean “other than a C corporation.”

(b) Section 1237(a)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to real property
 subdivided for sale, is modified to provide that an improvement shall be deemed to be made by the taxpayer if that improvement was made by an “S corporation” that included the taxpayer as a shareholder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 211.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24990.5.

The provisions of Section 1212 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to capital loss carrybacks and carryovers, are modified as follows:

(a) Section 1212(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to capital loss carrybacks, shall not apply.

(b) Section 1212(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules on carrybacks, shall not apply.

(c) Sections 1212(b) and 1212(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to other taxpayers and carryback of losses from Section 1256 contracts to offset prior gains from such contracts, respectively, shall not
 apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 118.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

24990.6.

(a) Section 1245(a)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain deductions treated as amortization, is modified to also refer to Sections 24356.2, 24356.3, and 24356.4.

(b) Section 1245(b)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disposition of amortizable Section 197 intangibles, shall apply to dispositions of property
 on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 83.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24990.7.

The provisions of Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to gain from certain sales or exchanges of stock in certain foreign corporations, shall not apply to transactions occurring after August 20, 1990, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 212.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24990.8.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, specific reference to Section 1223(4) to (16), inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code in this part shall instead be treated as a reference to Section 1223(3) to (15), inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 84.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24990.9.

The amendments made to Sections 1221(a)(3) and 1231(b)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 13314 of Public Law 115-97, relating to certain self-created property not treated as a capital asset, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 119.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24991.

Section 1275(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the definition of tax-exempt obligation, does not apply but instead the term “tax-exempt obligation” means an obligation the interest on which is exempt from tax under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

24993.

(a) Section 7872 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the treatment of loans with below market interest rates, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 7872(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exception for loans to qualified continuing care facilities, shall apply to calendar years beginning on or after
 January 1, 2010, with respect to loans made before, on, or after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 85.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24995.

The provisions of Part VI of Subchapter P of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of certain passive foreign investment companies, shall not be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1465, Sec. 56.   Effective September 28, 1988.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1988, by Sec. 77 of Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Wash Sales of Stock or Securities [24998. - 24998.]

24998.

The provisions of Sections 1091 and 1092 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to loss from wash sales of stock or securities, and straddles, respectively, shall be applicable for purposes of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 11, Sec. 86.   Effective February 19, 1988.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, by Sec. 95 of Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. Allocation of Income [25101. - 25141.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [25101. - 25108.]

25101.

When the income of a taxpayer subject to the tax imposed under this part is derived from or attributable to sources both within and without the state the tax shall be measured by the net income derived from or attributable to sources within this state in accordance with the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120). However, any method of apportionment shall take into account as income derived from or attributable to sources without the state, income derived from or attributable to transportation by sea or air without the state, whether or not the transportation is located in or subject to the jurisdiction of any other state, the
 United States or any foreign country.

If the Franchise Tax Board reapportions net income upon its examination of any return, it shall, upon the written request of the taxpayer, disclose to it the basis upon which its reapportionment has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

25101.1.

The amendments made at the 1957 Regular Session of the Legislature to Section 25101 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be applicable only with respect to income years beginning after December 31, 1956. The determination as to whether income derived from or attributable to transportation by sea or air is allocable to or taxable by California for any income year beginning before January 1, 1957, shall be made as if Section 25101 had not been amended at the 1957 Regular Session of the Legislature and without inferences drawn from the fact that such amendments were not expressly made applicable with respect to income years beginning before January 1,
 1957.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2097.)
-------------------------------------------

25101.15.

If the income of two or more taxpayers is derived solely from sources within this state and their business activities are such that if conducted within and without this state a combined report would be required to determine their business income derived from sources within this state, then such taxpayers shall be allowed to determine their business income in accordance with Section 25101.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 1980.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1980, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

25101.3.

The property factor as it relates to the aircraft of an air carrier or foreign air carrier, as defined in Section 1150, or the operator of an air taxi, as defined in Section 1154, shall be allocated on the basis of a formula consisting of time and arrivals and departures as follows:

(a) The time in state is the proportionate amount of time, both in the air and on the ground, that certificated aircraft have spent within the state during the taxable year as compared to the total time
 everywhere during the taxable year. This factor shall be multiplied by 75 percent.
